Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 3. The Alaska Administrative Register and Code.

Sec. 44.62.130.
Codification and publication.

The lieutenant governor shall provide for the continuing compilation, codification, and publication, with periodic supplements, of all regulations filed by the lieutenant governor’s office, or of appropriate references to any regulations the printing of which the lieutenant governor finds to be impractical, such as detailed schedules or forms otherwise available to the public, or which are of limited or particular application. The publication of compiled regulations is the Alaska Administrative Code. The periodic supplements to it are the Alaska Administrative Register. The code and register must contain appropriate annotations to judicial decisions and opinions of the attorney general.

The Department of Law shall prescribe a uniform system of indexing, numbering, arrangement of text, and citation of authority and history notes for the Alaska Administrative Code.

History.

(§ 1 art III (ch 1) ch 143 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 70 SLA 1966; am § 6 ch 40 SLA 1969; am § 101 ch 59 SLA 1982)

Administrative Code. —

For Alaska regulations, see 1 AAC 5.

For inspections, citations, and proposed penalties, see 8 AAC 61, art. 2.

Sec. 44.62.140.
Distribution of code and register.

Except as provided in this section, the lieutenant governor shall supply a complete set of the Alaska Administrative Code, and of the Alaska Administrative Register, and of each supplement to the code or register to the clerk of each local government unit, or if the authority to accept filings is delegated, to the person to whom this authority is delegated. A local government unit may decide to be excluded from the distribution requirements of this subsection. After receiving notice from the local government unit of the unit’s decision to be excluded, the lieutenant governor shall exclude that local government unit from the distribution requirements of this subsection.

A local government unit that requests to be excluded from the distribution requirements of (a) of this section may request to start receiving distributions as described under (a) of this section by providing written notice to the lieutenant governor. No later than July 1 of the fiscal year following receipt of notice by the lieutenant governor, the lieutenant governor shall include the local government unit in the distribution.

History.

(§ 2 art III (ch 1) ch 143 SLA 1959; am §§ 1, 2 ch 82 SLA 2008)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2008 amendment, effective July 1, 2008, added “Except as provided in this section” at the beginning of subsection (a), added the last two sentences of subsection (a), and added subsection (b).

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 82, SLA 2008 (HB 344) proposing the 2008 amendments to this section, see 2008 House Journal 1829 — 1830.

Sec. 44.62.150.
Price. [Repealed, § 49 ch 127 SLA 1974.]

Sec. 44.62.160.
Date and content of register.

The Alaska Administrative Register shall be published quarterly on the first day of the month. All regulations required to be submitted under AS

44.62.040

that are filed by the first day of the month preceding publication shall be published in the register for that quarter.

If during a quarter no regulation, amendment, or order of repeal has been filed the regular quarterly register shall be published reflecting that fact.

History.

(§ 4 art III (ch 1) ch 143 SLA 1959; am § 3 ch 58 SLA 1969; am § 28 ch 23 SLA 1995)

Sec. 44.62.170.
Form of publication. [Repealed, § 2 ch 57 SLA 1969.]

Sec. 44.62.175.
Alaska Online Public Notice System.

The lieutenant governor shall develop and supervise the Alaska Online Public Notice System, to be maintained on the state’s site on the Internet. The lieutenant governor shall prescribe the form of notices posted on the system by state agencies. The Alaska Online Public Notice System must include

notices of proposed actions given under AS

44.62.190(a)

;

notices of state agency meetings required under AS

44.62.310(e)

, even if the meeting has been held;

notices of solicitations to bid issued under AS

36.30.130

;

notices of state agency requests for proposals issued under AS

18.55.255

,

18.55.320

; AS

36.30.210

; AS

37.05.316

; AS

38.05.120

; and AS

43.40.010

;

executive orders and administrative orders issued by the governor;

written delegations of authority made by the governor or the head of a principal department under AS

44.17.010

;

the text or a summary of the text of a regulation or order of repeal of a regulation for which notice is given under AS

11.71.125

or AS

44.62.190(a)

, including an emergency regulation or repeal regardless of whether it has taken effect;

notices required by AS

44.62.245(b)

regarding an amended version of a document or other material incorporated by reference in a regulation;

a summary of the text of recently issued published opinions of the attorney general;

a list of vacancies on boards, commissions, and other bodies whose members are appointed by the governor;

in accordance with AS

39.52.240(h)

, advisory opinions of the attorney general;

notices required by AS

26.30.010(d)

and (e) regarding applications for military facility zones; and

notices of substances scheduled by an emergency regulation under AS

11.71.125

.

The issuer of the notice, order, delegation, text, summary, or list in (a) of this section shall post on the Alaska Online Public Notice System the notice, order, delegation, text, summary, or list, prepared in the format required by the lieutenant governor.

A request for a printed copy of a required posting on the Alaska Online Public Notice System may be made under AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.220

to any state employee designated by the lieutenant governor to receive requests.

The lieutenant governor shall provide for a permanent, electronic archive system of notices posted on the Alaska Online Public Notice System under this section. Access to the electronic archive system shall be made available to the public.

The lieutenant governor may delegate duties under this section to qualified state employees.

A person may not maintain an action based on a posting or lack of posting on the Alaska Online Public Notice System.

History.

(§ 2 ch 59 SLA 1985; am § 5 ch 87 SLA 1986; am § 48 ch 106 SLA 1986; am § 80 ch 138 SLA 1986; am § 76 ch 14 SLA 1987; am § 22 ch 90 SLA 1991; am § 3 ch 54 SLA 2000; am § 2 ch 20 SLA 2012; am § 28 ch 9 SLA 2013; am § 21 ch 22 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

To correct manifest errors in (a)(4) of this section, a reference to AS

46.11.030

was deleted in 1985 because that section was repealed in 1983, and in 1986 a reference to AS

37.05.316

was substituted for a reference to AS

37.05.315(d)

.

In 2000, in subsection (c), “AS

40.25.110

-

40.25.220

” was substituted for “AS 09.25.110 -

09.25.220

” to reflect the 2000 renumbering of AS 09.25.110 -

09.25.220

.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2012 amendment, effective July 1, 2012, added (a)(12).

The 2013 amendment, effective May 10, 2013, in (a)(8), substituted “recently issued published opinions of the attorney general” for “recently issued formal opinions and memoranda of advice of the attorney general”.

The 2018 amendment, effective September 12, 2018, in (a), inserted “AS

11.71.125

or” in (a)(7), following “notice is given under”, added (a)(13), and made related changes.

Opinions of attorney general. —

A schedule of fixed monthly meetings of the Museum Collections Advisory Committee, published twice yearly, and stating date, time, and place of the meetings, is reasonable notice and satisfies the requirements of AS

44.62.310(e)

. If the need for unscheduled meetings arises, the public may be notified by public service announcements, as long as the department is confident that the public will in fact be made aware of the meeting by the announcements. If in doubt, newspaper advertisements should be taken out to insure adequate notice. Regardless of the media used, three days notice, excluding weekends and holidays, should be considered the minimum necessary to satisfy the statutory requirements. Dec. 30, 1992 Op. Att’y Gen.